Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1415
Decal fee; Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund; use.

(1) An additional fee may be collected by the issuing agency or association from a licensee for each annual decal issued pursuant to the agreement. The fee shall be in an amount determined by the director to be sufficient to recover reasonable administrative costs of the agreement but not more than ten dollars per annual decal. The fee shall be remitted to the State Treasurer and credited to the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund, except that the director may by contract with an association provide for the association to retain a portion of the fee as payment for services rendered under the contract.

(2) The Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund shall be used to pay administrative costs of the International Fuel Tax Agreement Act. If any staff used for enforcing the agreement provided for in the act is used for any other state tax or program, the costs attributed to such other tax or program shall be borne by either the General Fund or the fund to which the money resulting from such other tax or program is credited, however it is appropriated by the Legislature. Any money in the Interstate Motor Carriers Base State Cash Fund on July 1, 1996, shall be transferred to the Motor Carrier Division Cash Fund on such date.

Laws 1988, LB 836, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1218, § 35.